Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF3837.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin PUBLIC AWARENESS CAMPAIGN; EXTREME RISK PROTECTION ORDERS.new text end new text begin $....... in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of public safety for a public awareness campaign to increase awareness of and educate the public and law enforcement about extreme risk protection orders. The commissioner may contract with a private entity for the public awareness campaign. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end